Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 2. Juvenile Justice Act
§ 14-6-227.
Predisposition studies and reports.

After a petition is filed alleging the child is delinquent, the court shall order the department to make a predisposition study and report. The court shall establish a deadline for completion of the report. While preparing the study the department shall consult with the child’s school and school district to determine the child’s educational needs. The study and report shall also cover:

The social history, environment and present condition of the child and his family;

The performance of the child in school, including whether the child receives special education services and how his goals and objectives might be impacted by the court’s disposition, provided the school receives authorization to share the information;

The presence of child abuse and neglect or domestic violence histories, past acts of violence, learning disabilities, cognitive disabilities or physical impairments and the necessary services to accommodate the disabilities and impairments;

The presence of any mental health or substance abuse risk factors, including current participation in counseling, therapy or treatment; and

Other matters relevant to the child’s present status as a delinquent, including any pertinent family information, treatment of the child or proper disposition of the case, including any information required by W.S. 21-13-315(d).

Within ten (10) days after a petition is filed alleging a child is delinquent, the court shall appoint a multidisciplinary team. Upon motion by a party, the court may add or dismiss a member of the multidisciplinary team.

through (vii) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

The multidisciplinary team shall include the following:

The child’s parent, parents or guardian;

A representative of the school district who has direct knowledge of the child and, if the child receives special education, is a member of the child’s individualized education plan team;

A representative of the department;

The child’s psychiatrist, psychologist or mental health professional;

The district attorney or his designee;

The child’s attorney or guardian ad litem, if one is appointed by the court;

The volunteer lay advocate, if one is appointed by the court; and

The foster parent.

In addition to the persons listed in subsection (c) of this section, the court may appoint one (1) or more of the following persons to the multidisciplinary team:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 236, § 4.

The child;

A relative;

If the predispositional study indicates a parent or child has special needs, an appropriate representative of the department of health’s substance abuse, mental health or developmental disabilities division who has knowledge of the services available in the state’s system of care that are pertinent to those identified needs;

Other professionals or persons who have particular knowledge relating to the child or his family, or expertise in children’s services and the child’s or parent’s specific disability or special needs, including linguistic and cultural needs.

Before the first multidisciplinary team meeting, the department of family services shall provide each member of the multidisciplinary team with a brief summary of the case detailing the allegations in the petition that have been adjudicated, if any. The multidisciplinary team shall, as quickly as reasonably possible, review the child’s personal and family history, school, mental health and department of family services records and any other pertinent information, for the purpose of making sanction recommendations. The team shall involve the child in the development of recommendations to the extent appropriate.

At the first multidisciplinary team meeting, the team shall formulate reasonable and attainable recommendations for the court outlining the goals or objectives the parents should be required to meet for the child to be returned to the home or for the case to be closed, or until ordered by the court in termination proceedings. At each subsequent meeting, the multidisciplinary team shall review the progress of the parents and the child, and shall reevaluate the plan ordered by the court. For cause, which shall be set forth with specificity, the multidisciplinary team may adjust its recommendations to the court with respect to the goals or objectives in the plan to effect the return of the child to the home or to close the case, or until ordered by the court in termination proceedings. The multidisciplinary team shall formulate written recommendations consistent with the purposes of this act. After each multidisciplinary team meeting, the coordinator shall prepare for submission to each member of the team and to the court a summary of the multidisciplinary team meeting specifically describing the recommendations for the court and the goals and objectives which should be met to return the child to the home or to close the case, or until ordered by the court in termination proceedings. If the recommendations for the case plan have been changed, the summary shall include a detailed explanation of the change in the recommendations and the reasons for the change.

All records, reports and sanction recommendations of the multidisciplinary team are confidential except as provided by this section. Any person who willfully violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00).

Except for consideration at a hearing on a motion to transfer the case to another court as provided in W.S.

14-6-237

, the court shall not consider any report or recommendation under this section prior to adjudication of the allegations in the petition without the consent of the child and the child’s parents, guardian or custodian.

Any member of a multidisciplinary team who cannot attend team meetings in person or by telephone may submit written reports and recommendations to the other team members and to the court. Individuals who are not members of the multidisciplinary team but have knowledge pertinent to the team’s decisions may be asked to provide information to the multidisciplinary team. The individuals shall be bound by the confidentiality provisions of subsection (g) of this section.

The department shall develop a case plan for a juvenile when there is a recommendation to place the child outside the home.

If the child is placed outside the home, the multidisciplinary team shall meet quarterly to review the child’s and the family’s progress toward meeting the goals or expectations in the case plan and the multidisciplinary team shall provide a written report with recommendations to the court prior to each review hearing.

No later than five (5) business days prior to the dispositional hearing, the multidisciplinary team shall file with the court the multidisciplinary team report which shall include the multidisciplinary team’s recommendations and the department case plan in a standard format established by the department.

Five (5) business days prior to each review hearing, the multidisciplinary team shall file with the court a report updating the multidisciplinary team report, the multidisciplinary team’s recommendations and the department case plan.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 28; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.28; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-128; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1984, ch. 67, § 1; 1987, ch. 221, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1993, ch. 161, § 1; 1996, ch. 106, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 236, §§ 2, 4; 2009, ch. 70, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, modifying duties, changing membership of the multidisciplinary team, and adding procedural provisions.

The 2009 amendment,

effective
July 1, 2009, in (e), added the first sentence, and in (f), added the first through third, and fifth and sixth sentences.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2009, ch. 70, § 2, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “The provisions of W.S. 14-3-427(e) and (f), 14-3-429(d), 14-6-227(e) and (f) and 14-6-427(e) and (f) as amended by section 1 of this act, shall apply to child protection cases in which a petition was filed under W.S.

14-3-412

,

14-6-212

or

14-6-412

on or after July 1, 2009.”

Failure to follow procedure warranted reversal. —

Dispositional order entered in a juvenile case relating to felony property was reversed and remanded because a predisposition report was not completed or reviewed, as required by this section. Moreover, the trial court failed to follow the particular sanction levels, and no reasons were given in writing for the failure to do so.
CT v. State (In re CT), 2006 WY 101, 140 P.3d 643,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2006).

Cited

in

BW v. State, 12 P.3d 675,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 14-6-228.
Abeyance of proceedings by consent decree; term of decree; reinstatement of proceedings; effect of discharge or completing term.

At any time after the filing of a petition alleging a child delinquent and before adjudication, the court may issue a consent decree ordering further proceedings held in abeyance and place a delinquent child under the supervision of a probation officer. The placement of the child is subject to the terms, conditions and stipulations agreed to by the parties affected. The consent decree shall not be entered without the consent of the district attorney, the child’s attorney, where applicable, and the child and the notification of the parents. Modifications to an existing consent decree may be allowed.

The consent decree shall be in writing and copies given to each of the parties. The decree shall include the case plan for the child.

A consent decree shall be in force for the period agreed upon by the parties but not longer than one (1) year unless the child is sooner discharged by the court.

If prior to discharge by the court or expiration of the consent decree, a child alleged to be delinquent fails to fulfill the terms and conditions of the decree or a new petition is filed alleging the child delinquent because of misconduct occurring during the term of the consent decree, the original petition and proceedings may be reinstated upon order of the court after hearing and the matter may proceed as though the consent decree had never been entered. If, as part of the consent decree, the child made an admission to any of the allegations contained in the original petition, that admission shall be entered only if the court orders that the original petition and proceeding be reinstated and the admissions, if any, be entered. If the admission is entered, the court may proceed to disposition pursuant to W.S.

14-6-226

.

If a consent decree is in effect and the child is in placement, the court shall hold a six (6) month and twelve (12) month review under W.S.

14-6-229

.

A child discharged by the court under a consent decree without reinstatement of the original petition and proceeding shall not thereafter be proceeded against in any court for the same offense or misconduct alleged in the original petition.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 29; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.29; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-129; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1984, ch. 67, § 1; 1987, ch. 221, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1995, ch. 154, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, § 2; 2004, ch. 127, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a), inserted “the child's attorney, where applicable” and added the last sentence; added (b); redesignated the former first sentence of (b) as (c); redesignated and rewrote the former second sentence of (b) as (d); added (e); and redesignated former (c) as (f) and inserted “and proceeding.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Applicability of double jeopardy to juvenile court proceedings, 5 ALR4th 234.

Quoted in

Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 14-6-229.
Decree where child adjudged delinquent; dispositions; terms and conditions; legal custody.

In determining the disposition to be made under this act in regard to any child:

The court shall review the predisposition report, the recommendations, if any, of the multidisciplinary team, the case plan and other reports or evaluations ordered by the court and indicate on the record what materials were considered in reaching the disposition;

If the court does not place the child in accordance with the recommendations of the predisposition report or multidisciplinary team, the court shall enter on the record specific findings of fact relied upon to support its decision to deviate from the recommended disposition;

When a child is adjudged by the court to be delinquent, the court shall enter its decree to that effect and make a disposition consistent with the purposes of this act;

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

The court shall not order an out-of-state placement unless:

Evidence has been presented to the court regarding the costs of the out-of-state placement being ordered together with evidence of the comparative costs of any suitable alternative in-state treatment program or facility, as determined by the department pursuant to W.S. 21-13-315(d)(vii), whether or not placement in the in-state program or facility is currently available;

The court makes an affirmative finding on the record that no placement can be made in a Wyoming institution or in a private residential treatment facility or group home located in Wyoming that can provide adequate treatment or services for the child; and

The court states on the record why no in-state placement is available.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3; 1993, ch. 210, § 3; 1984, ch. 67, §§ 2, 3; 1987, ch. 217, § 2, ch. 221, § 3.

If the child is found to be delinquent the court may impose any sanction authorized by W.S.

14-6-245

through

14-6-252

.

through (vi) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 119, § 3.

In cases where a child is ordered removed from the child’s home:

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

If a child is committed or transferred to an agency or institution under this section:

At least every three (3) months the agency or institution shall recommend to the court if the order should be continued;

Not less than once every six (6) months, the court of jurisdiction shall conduct a formal review to assess and determine the appropriateness of the current placement, the reasonable efforts made to reunify the family, the safety of the child and the permanency plan for the child. During this review:

The department of family services shall present to the court:

If the permanency plan is classified as another planned permanent living arrangement, documentation of the ongoing and unsuccessful efforts to return the child home or place the child for adoption or with a legal guardian or a fit and willing relative for purposes of guardianship or adoption, including evidence of efforts to use social media or other search technology to find biological family members for the child;

Efforts made to ensure that the child is provided, to the greatest extent possible, the opportunity to participate in age appropriate or developmentally appropriate activities and experiences as defined in W.S.

14-13-101

(a)(i) to promote healthy child and adolescent development consistent with W.S.

14-13-101

through

14-13-104

; and

If the child is placed in a qualified residential treatment program:

a.

Information to show that ongoing assessment of the child’s strengths and needs continues to support the determination that placement in a qualified residential treatment program provides the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child in the least restrictive environment consistent with the short-term and long-term goals of the child and the child’s permanency plan;

b.

The specific treatment needs that will be met for the child in the placement;

c.

The length of time the child is expected to remain in the placement;

d.

The efforts made by the department of family services to prepare the child to return home or be placed for adoption or legal guardianship.

If the permanency plan is classified as another planned permanent living arrangement:

a.

Make a judicial determination and explain why, as of the date of the review, another planned permanent living arrangement is the best permanency plan for the child; and

b.

Provide reasons why it continues not to be in the best interest of the child to return home or be placed for adoption or with a legal guardian, or be placed with a fit and willing relative for purposes of guardianship or adoption.

Make findings whether the child has been provided, to the greatest extent possible, the opportunity to participate in age appropriate or developmentally appropriate activities and experiences as defined in W.S. 14-13-101(a)(i) to promote healthy child and adolescent development consistent with W.S. 14-13-101 through

14-13-104

.

The court shall:

(1)

Determine whether the permanency plan is in the best interest of the child and whether the department of family services has made reasonable efforts to finalize the plan;

(2)

Order the department of family services to take any additional steps necessary to effectuate the terms of the permanency plan;

(3)

Ask the child or, if the child is not present at the review, the child’s guardian ad litem or other legal representative about the child’s desired permanency outcome;

The court shall order the parents or other legally obligated person to pay a reasonable sum for the support and treatment of the child as required by W.S.

14-6-236

, or shall state on the record the reasons why an order for support was not entered;

In cases where the child is placed in custody of the department, support shall be established by the department through a separate civil action;

Any order regarding potential placement at a psychiatric residential treatment facility shall not specify a particular psychiatric residential treatment facility or level of care for the placement of the child;

If the child is placed in a qualified residential treatment program:

Within thirty (30) days of the placement a qualified individual shall conduct an assessment to determine whether the child’s needs can be met through placement with family members or in a foster family home, or if the placement in a qualified residential treatment program provides the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child in the least restrictive environment consistent with the short-term and long-term goals of the child and the child’s permanency plan;

Within sixty (60) days of the placement the court shall:

Consider the assessment completed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

Determine whether the needs of the child can be met through placement in a foster family home or whether the placement in a qualified residential treatment program provides the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child in the least restrictive environment;

Determine whether the placement is consistent with the short-term and long-term goals for the child as specified in the child’s permanency plan;

Approve or disapprove the placement.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 119, § 3.

An institution, organization or agency vested with legal custody of a child by court order shall have the right to determine where and with whom the child shall live, provided that placement of the child does not remove him from the state of Wyoming without court authorization. An individual vested with legal custody of a child by court order shall personally exercise custodial rights and responsibilities unless otherwise authorized by the court.

Whenever the court vests legal custody of a child in an institution, organization or agency it shall transmit with the order copies of all clinical reports, social studies and other information pertinent to the care and treatment of the child. The institution, organization or agency receiving legal custody of a child shall provide the court with any information concerning the child that the court may request.

In placing a child in the custody of an individual or a private agency or institution, the court shall give primary consideration to the needs and welfare of the child. Where a choice of equivalent services exists, the court shall, whenever practicable, select a person or an agency or institution governed by persons of the same religion as that of the parents of the child. In case of a difference in the religious faith of the parents, then the court shall select the person, agency or institution governed by persons of the religious faith of the child, or if the religious faith of the child is not ascertainable, then of the faith of either parent.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

The clerk of the court granting probation to a youth adjudicated delinquent shall send a certified copy of the order to the department of family services if the department has been requested to provide supervision of the probationer.

At the time of granting probation or at any later time, the court may request the department of family services to provide supervision of the probationer. The supervising probation officer shall not be required to supervise or report on a youth granted probation unless requested to do so by the court granting probation.

Absent a specific provision in the placement order requiring prior court approval for any change in placement, a department of state government vested with temporary legal custody of a child by court order under this section has authority to place the child in a residential facility or other out-of-home placement of similar or less restrictive confinement provided:

At least ten (10) days prior to the change in placement written notice of the proposed placement is served upon the child, the child’s parents, the child’s representative, the current placement provider and the office of the district attorney of original jurisdiction, personally or by certified mail to the recipient’s last known address; and

None of the parties within ten (10) days after notice is filed with the juvenile court having jurisdiction, makes a written objection to the proposed change in placement.

If a placement order vesting a department of state government with temporary legal custody of a child under this section includes a provision that court approval shall be required prior to any change in placement, the department may proceed to place the child in a residential facility or other out-of-home placement of similar or less restrictive confinement, and the court shall be deemed to have approved such change in placement, if:

The conditions of paragraphs (o)(i) and (ii) of this section are met; and

The court on its own motion does not set the matter for hearing within fifteen (15) days after notice of the proposed change in placement is filed with the juvenile court.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 119, § 3.

An agency of state government vested with temporary legal custody of a child under this section shall have the right to transport the child as necessary.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 30; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.30; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-130; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1984, ch. 67, §§ 1 to 3; 1987, ch 217, §§ 1, 2; ch. 221, §§ 1 to 3; 1989, ch. 40, § 1; 1990, ch. 24, § 1; ch. 99, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; ch. 196, § 1; 1993, ch. 142, § 2; ch. 161, § 1; ch. 210, § 3; 1995, ch. 154, § 1; ch. 177, § 1; ch. 202, § 2; 1996, ch. 58, § 2; ch. 106, § 1; 1997, ch. 119, §§ 2, 3; ch. 199, §§ 2, 3; 1999, ch. 8, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; 2013 ch. 164, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 95, § 2, effective March 4, 2016; 2020 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to establishment of youth treatment center, see §

25-1-201

.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a)(i), substituted “review” for “place on the record,” and inserted “the case plan and other reports or evaluations ordered by the court and indicate on the record what materials were considered in reaching the disposition” at the end, and in (a)(iii) deleted “and in accord with the actual facilities presently available when the decree is entered” at the end; in (e)(ii)(B) substituted “six (6) months” for “twelve (12) months,” and deleted the final sentence pertaining to placement in a state institution, in (e)(iii) deleted “on its own motion, or on the motion of the person, agency or institution vested with custody or to whom compensation is due,” and added (e)(iv); and added (r).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (e)(v).

The 2016 amendment,

in (e)(ii)(B), added “During this review” at the end of the present introductory language, and added (e)(ii)(B)(I) and (e)(ii)(B)(II).

Laws 2016, ch. 95, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 4, 2016.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (e)(ii)(B)(I)(3) and (e)(vi); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Interested relative of neglected child may become party in neglect action

through a motion to grant present custody. In In Interest of MKM, 792 P.2d 1369,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1990).

Jurisdiction exists despite erroneous placement of child. —

The trial court's erroneous application of the law relating to the placing of a child adjudged to be neglected did not deprive the court of jurisdiction, nor cause its decree to be void. In In Interest of WM, 778 P.2d 1106,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1989), reh'g denied,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. Aug. 25, 1989).

“Evaluation and treatment” denotes a single course of action. —

The plain language of the statute reveals that the legislature gave the district courts authority to require that a parent or a child undergo an evaluation and indicated treatment or undergo another program which was designed to rectify the problems which contributed to the adjudication. The phrase “evaluation and indicated treatment” denotes a single course of action. While an evaluation may be imperative in some cases, in other instances an evaluation may not be necessary in order for the district court to determine that a certain program may be beneficial in solving the problems which resulted in the minor's delinquent behavior. ELR v. State, 902 P.2d 696,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1995).

No counseling for parents absent their consent. —

When a child is adjudged by the court to be delinquent and is permitted to live in the parents' home, the consent of the parents is required before the court has authority to order the parents to go to counseling or evaluation. In Interest of C. N., 816 P.2d 1282,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1991).

Specific finding not required. —

Although the district court failed to specifically find that ordered parenting classes constituted a “program designed to rectify problems which contributed to the adjudication,” the statute does not require the district court to make that specific finding and therefore the district court properly ordered the defendant to attend the classes. ELR v. State, 902 P.2d 696,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1995).

Out-of-state placement. —

Juvenile court did not exceed its statutory authority when it ordered the State to pay for private out-of-state placement for juvenile adjudged delinquent because statutory requirements were substantially adhered to. In re DCP, 2001 WY 77, 30 P.3d 29,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2001).

Probation condition requiring juvenile to submit to random chemical testing

for the presence of alcohol was encompassed by subsections (f)(vi) and (f)(vii) where condition was designed to avoid any future problems involving alcohol. In re Interests of ALJ, 836 P.2d 307,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1992).

Failure to follow procedure warranted reversal. —

Dispositional order entered in a juvenile case relating to felony property was reversed and remanded because a predisposition report was not completed or reviewed, as required by this section. Moreover, the trial court failed to follow the particular sanction levels, and no reasons were given in writing for the failure to do so.
CT v. State (In re CT), 2006 WY 101, 140 P.3d 643,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2006).

Revoking driving privileges. —

Court's order was within statute's authority where court used the word “revoke” as opposed to using the words “restrict or restrain”; there was no discernible difference between “revoking” and “restraining or restricting” the child's driving privileges. In re Interests of ALJ, 836 P.2d 307,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1992).

Applied

in

State in Interest of C., 638 P.2d 165,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 410

(Wyo. 1981); CH v. Campbell County D-PASS, 699 P.2d 830,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 484

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

WJH v. State, 2001 WY 54, 24 P.3d 1147,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2001).

Stated

in

In Interest of MFB, 860 P.2d 1140,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980); In re AJ, 736 P.2d 721,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 435

(Wyo. 1987).

Law reviews. —

For article “Admissibility of Violations of Law by Child as Evidence in Prosecution of Parents for Criminal Neglect,” see VII Wyo. L.J. 133 (1953).

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Truancy as indicative of delinquency or incorrigibility, justifying commitment of infant or juvenile, 5 ALR4th 1211.

Foster parent's right to immunity from foster child's negligence claims, 55 ALR4th 778.

Application of rule of Dorszynski v. United States requiring that sentencing court make express finding of “no benefit” from treatment under Youth Corrections Act (18 USC § 5005 et seq. [repealed]), 54 ALR Fed 382.

§ 14-6-230.
Orders of protection; requirements.

On application of any party to the proceedings or on its own motion the court may make an order of protection in support of the decree and order of disposition, restraining or otherwise controlling the conduct of the child’s parents, guardian or custodian or any party to the proceeding whom the court finds to be encouraging, causing or contributing to the acts or conditions which bring the child within the provisions of this act.

The order of protection may require the person against whom it is directed to do or to refrain from doing any acts required or forbidden by law and necessary for the welfare of the child and the enforcement of the order of disposition, including the following requirements to:

Perform any legal obligation of support;

Not make contact with the child or his place of abode;

Refrain from conduct which in any way interferes with or disrupts the control and supervision of the child by his legal custodian;

Permit a parent reasonable visitation privileges under specified conditions and terms;

Give proper attention to care of the home and to refrain from conduct detrimental to the child and the home environment; or

Enforce the child’s compliance with the terms and conditions imposed upon him by the order of disposition.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 31; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.31; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-131; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Quoted

in

KT v. State, 902 P.2d 1288,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 14-6-231.
Release of child from institution; duration of orders of disposition; termination of orders.

A child committed to the Wyoming boys’ school, the Wyoming girls’ school or the Wyoming state hospital may be released from that institution by the agency having the direct authority and control of the institution. This release shall not affect any other terms or conditions of the court’s order. The agency shall notify the court of any planned release and shall recommend further disposition of the child. The court shall discharge the child from further court jurisdiction or shall enter any other order of disposition specified under W.S.

14-6-229

for a child found to be delinquent.

An order of disposition shall remain in force for an indefinite period until terminated by the court whenever it appears the purpose of the order has been achieved and it is in the child’s best interest that he be discharged from further court jurisdiction.

Unless sooner terminated by court order, all orders issued under this act shall terminate with respect to a child adjudicated:

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

Delinquent, when he reaches twenty-one (21) years of age;

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 32; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.32; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-132; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1984, ch. 67, § 1; 1987, ch. 217, § 1; 1989, ch. 40, § 1; 1990, ch. 24, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1996, ch. 49, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, §§ 2, 3.

Cross references. —

As to establishment of youth treatment center, see §

25-1-201

.

As to Wyoming girls' school, see chapter 4 of title 25.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Quoted

in

In Interest of WM, 778 P.2d 1106,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1989).

Stated

in

In Interest of MKM, 792 P.2d 1369,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1990).

Cited

in

McAdams v. State, 907 P.2d 1302,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 220

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

§ 14-6-232.
Probation revocation hearing; how commenced and conducted; contents of petition; disposition.

A child on probation incident to an adjudication of his delinquency who commits a new delinquent act or violates the terms and conditions of his probation may be proceeded against in a probation revocation hearing.

A proceeding to revoke probation shall be commenced by a petition designated as “A Petition to Revoke Probation” and shall be heard by the court without a jury. The petition shall:

Be reviewed and prepared by the district attorney in the same manner and shall contain the same information as required by W.S.

14-6-212

;

Set forth the date when the child was placed on probation and the time and manner in which notice of the terms of probation were given; and

Be served together with an order to appear on all parties having an interest in the proceedings as provided in W.S.

14-6-213

.

If a child is found to have violated the terms of the child’s probation, the court may amend the terms and conditions of the probation order, extend the period of probation or make any other order of disposition specified in W.S. 14-6-229(d).

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 3.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 33; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.33; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-133; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1990, ch. 99, § 1; 1993, ch. 161, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, §§ 2, 3.

Notice and hearing provisions mandatory. —

The court erred when it revoked a juvenile's probation for failure to comply with the terms of probation at a review hearing conducted without notice that revocation would be considered. The notice and hearing provisions of this section are mandatory for the revocation of probation for any juvenile who has been subjected to an order of delinquency or supervision by the court. M.M. v. State, 827 P.2d 1117,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1992).

Due process not violated by probation terms. —

Due process rights were not violated in a juvenile case because the recommendations of the multi-disciplinary team and the preliminary findings of the juvenile probation officer were included in the trial courts' order, which met the statutory purpose of designing individualized dispositions. Moreover, defendant signed off on these conditions, so he had actual knowledge of them.
CT v. State (In re CT), 2006 WY 101, 140 P.3d 643,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2006).

Cited

in

AMB v. State, 892 P.2d 799,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 1995).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right and sufficiency of allocation in probation revocation proceeding, 70 ALR5th 533.

§ 14-6-233.
Appeal; right generally; transcript provided; cost thereof.

Any party including the state may appeal any final order, judgment or decree of the juvenile court to the supreme court within the time and in the manner provided by the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Upon motion of the child or his parents, guardian or custodian, supported by affidavit stating they are financially unable to purchase a transcript of the proceeding, a transcript or so much thereof necessary to support the appeal shall be provided at no cost or at a cost the court determines they are able to pay. Any cost of the transcript not charged to the appellant shall be certified by the court to the county treasurer and paid from the funds of the county in which the proceedings were held.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 34; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.34; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-134; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; ch. 130 § 1.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 127, § 2, effective July 1, 2004, in (a), substituted “Appellate” for “Civil.”

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 130, § 1, also in (a), substituted “Appellate” for “Civil.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

See the conflicting legislation note. This section has been set out incorporating changes made by both 2004 acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Form of notice of appeal. —

Where juvenile's counsel did not correctly type the name of the hearing and order in the notice of appeal, it would have put form over substance to have denied appellate jurisdiction where counsel correctly identified the object of the appeal and also attached to that notice of appeal a copy of that juvenile court's order following a restitutional hearing; it was clear what the juvenile was appealing. TPJ v. State, 2003 WY 49, 66 P.3d 710,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2003).

No appeal by state where violation committed prior to section's enactment. —

A county attorney cannot appeal a dismissal of proceedings brought against a minor under the juvenile court provisions of 1971, when the proceedings are based upon a violation of law alleged to have been committed prior to enactment of the 1971 law, since the former Juvenile Court Act of 1951 contained no provision for appeal on the part of the state. In re Jones, 500 P.2d 690,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 298

(Wyo. 1972).

Quoted

in

State in Interest of C., 638 P.2d 165,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 410

(Wyo. 1981).